it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto > Pickleball: Accessori e strumenti di allenamento da pickleball; Borse e custodie da pickleball; Macchine lanciapalle da pickleball; Reti da pickleball; Racchette da pickleball; Set da pickleball; Palline da pickleball
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲 > 匹克球: 匹克球配件與訓練輔助器材; 匹克球提袋與收納盒; 匹克球發球機; 匹克球網; 匹克球拍; 匹克球套組; 匹克球用球
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur > Pickleball: Accessoires et matériel d’entraînement de pickleball; Sacs et housses de pickleball; Lance-balles de pickleball; Filets de pickleball; Palettes de pickleball; Kits de pickleball; Balles de pickleball
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien > Pickleball: Pickleball-Zubehör & Trainingshilfen; Pickleball-Taschen & -Hüllen; Pickleball-Ballmaschinen; Pickleball-Netze; Pickleball-Schläger; Pickleball-Sets; Pickleball-Bälle
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen > Pickleball: Accessoires en trainingshulpmiddelen voor pickleball; Pickleballtassen en -koffers; Pickleball-balmachines; Pickleballnetten; Pickleball-paddles; Pickleballsets; Pickleballen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито > Пикълбол: Аксесоари и помощни средства за тренировки за пикълбол; Чанти и калъфи за пикълбол; Машини за пикълбол топки; Мрежи за пикълбол; Ракети за пикълбол; Комплекти за пикълбол; Топки за пикълбол
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber > Pickleball: Accesorii și auxiliare de antrenament pentru pickleball; Genți și carcase pentru pickleball; Mașini de mingi pentru pickleball; Fileuri pentru pickleball; Palete pentru pickleball; Seturi de pickleball; Mingi de pickleball
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill > Pickleball: Tilbehør og treningshjelpemidler for pickleball; Bager og futteraler for pickleball; Ballmaskiner for pickleball; Pickleball-nett; Pickleballracketer; Pickleball-sett; Pickleballer
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry > Pickleball: Příslušenství a tréninkové pomůcky na pickleball; Tašky a pouzdra na pickleball; Vrhačky míčků na pickleball; Sítě na pickleball; Pálky na pickleball; Sady na pickleball; Míčky na pickleball
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre > Pickleball: Acessórios e equipamentos de treino para pickleball; Bolsas e estojos para pickleball; Lançadores de bolas para pickleball; Redes para pickleball; Raquetes de pickleball; Conjuntos de pickleball; Bolas de pickleball
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời > Pickleball: Phụ kiện & dụng cụ tập luyện pickleball; Túi & hộp đựng vợt pickleball; Máy phát bóng pickleball; Lưới pickleball; Vợt pickleball; Bộ chơi pickleball; Pickleballs
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе > Пиклбол: Аксессуары и тренажеры для пиклбола; Сумки и чехлы для пиклбола; Пушки для подачи мячей для пиклбола; Сетки для пиклбола; Ракетки для пиклбола; Наборы для пиклбола; Мячи для пиклбола
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem > Pickleball: Dodatki in pripomočki za pickleball; Torbe in ovitki za pickleball; Stroji za pickleball; Mreže za pickleball; Loparji za pickleball; Kompleti za pickleball; Žoge za pickleball
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre > Pickleball: Accesorios y ayudas de entrenamiento de pickleball; Bolsas y estuches de pickleball; Máquinas lanzapelotas de pickleball; Redes de pickleball; Palas de pickleball; Sets de pickleball; Pelotas para pickleball
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이 > 피클볼: 피클볼 액세서리 및 훈련용 보조 기구; 피클볼 가방 및 케이스; 피클볼 볼 머신; 피클볼 네트; 피클볼 패들; 피클볼 세트; 피클볼 공
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları > Pickleball: Pickleball aksesuarları ve antrenman yardımcıları; Pickleball çantaları ve kılıfları; Pickleball top fırlatma makineleri; Pickleball fileleri; Pickleball Raketleri; Pickleball setleri; Pickleball Topları
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom > Piklbol: Dodaci i pomagala za vježbanje piklbola; Torbe i futrole za piklbol; Sprave za lopte za piklbol; Mreže za piklbol; Reketi za piklbol; Kompleti za piklbol; Loptice za piklbol
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok > Pickleball: Pickleball kiegészítők és oktatási segédeszközök; Pickleball táskák és tokok; Pickleball labdaadogató gépek; Pickleball hálók; Pickleball-lapátok; Pickleball készletek; Pickleballok
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง > เกมพิคเคิลบอล: อุปกรณ์เสริมและอุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมพิกเคิลบอล; กระเป๋าและเคสพิกเคิลบอล; เครื่องยิงลูกพิกเคิลบอล; ตาข่ายพิกเคิลบอล; ไม้สำหรับตีพิคเคิลบอล; ชุดพิกเคิลบอล; กีฬาพิคเคิลบอล
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου > Pickleball: Αξεσουάρ και βοηθήματα προπόνησης pickleball; Τσάντες και θήκες pickleball; Μηχανήματα εκτόξευσης μπαλών pickleball; Φιλέ pickleball; Ρακέτες Pickleball; Σετ pickleball; Μπάλες Pickleball
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu > Pickleball: Akcesoria i sprzęt treningowy do pickleballa; Torby i pokrowce do pickleballa; Maszyny do wyrzucania piłek do pickleballa; Siatki do pickleballa; Rakietki do pickleballa; Zestawy do pickleballa; Piłki do gry w pickleball
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry > Pickleball: Príslušenstvo a tréningové pomôcky na pickleball; Tašky a púzdra na pickleball; Odpaľovač na pickleball; Siete na pickleball; Rakety na pickleball; Súpravy na pickleball; Loptičky na pickleball
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏 > 匹克球: 匹克球配件和训练辅助工具; 匹克球包与收纳盒; 匹克球发球机; 匹克球网; 匹克球球拍; 匹克球套装; 匹克球用球
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek > Pickleball: Tillbehör och träningshjälpmedel för pickleball; Väskor och fodral för pickleball; Bollmaskiner för pickleball; Pickleballnät; Pickleball-racketar; Pickleball-set; Bollar för pickleball
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai > Piklbolas: Piklbolo priedai ir treniruočių priemonės; Piklbolo krepšiai ir dėklai; Piklbolo kamuoliukų mašinos; Piklbolo tinklai; Piklbolo raketės; Piklbolo rinkiniai; Piklbolo kamuoliukai
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit > Pickleball: Pickleball-tarvikkeet ja -harjoitusvälineet; Pickleball-laukut ja -kotelot; Pickleball-pallokoneet; Pickleball-verkot; Pickleball-mailat; Pickleball-setit; Pickleball-pallot
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior > Pickleball: Acessórios e equipamentos de treino de pickleball; Sacos e estojos de pickleball; Máquinas de bolas de pickleball; Redes de pickleball; Raquetes de Pickleball; Conjuntos de pickleball; Bolas de Pickleball
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil > Pickleball: Tilbehør og træningsudstyr til pickleball; Tasker og etuier til pickleball; Pickleball-boldmaskiner; Pickleball-net; Bat til pickleball; Pickleball-sæt; Bolde til pickleball
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games > Pickleball: Pickleball Accessories & Training Aids; Pickleball Bags & Cases; Pickleball Ball Machines; Pickleball Nets; Pickleball Paddles; Pickleball Sets; Pickleballs
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム > ピックルボール用品: ピックルボールアクセサリー＆トレーニング用品; ピックルボールバッグ＆ケース; ピックルボール用ボールマシン; ピックルボールネット; ピックルボールラケット; ピックルボールセット; ピックルボール